Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB333.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 23 of the act of June 22, 1931 (P.L.594, No.203), referred to as the Township State Highway Law, is amended by adding a route to read:Section 23. The township roads to be taken over, under the provisions of this act, in the COUNTY OF DAUPHIN, are those situate and described as follows:* * *Bow Creek Road Route T-612. The section of Bow Creek Road beginning at the intersection with Jonestown Road (T-601), <--1234567891011121314151617181920212223 heading in a northerly direction to a point at the intersection of SR 443 (formerly Legislative Route 22024) a distance of 10,085 feet or 1.91 miles.SECTION 2. SECTION 67 OF THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A ROUTE TO READ:SECTION 67. THE TOWNSHIP ROADS TO BE TAKEN OVER, UNDER THE PROVISIONS OF THIS ACT, IN THE COUNTY OF YORK, ARE THOSE SITUATE AND DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:* * *SUSQUEHANNA TRAIL T-956 (FORMERLY LEGISLATIVE ROUTE 333). UPON COMPLETION OF CERTAIN PROPOSED IMPROVEMENTS AND COMPLETION OF THE CANAL ROAD STATE ROUTE 921 BETTERMENT PROJECT, THAT SECTION OF THE SUSQUEHANNA TRAIL BEGINNING AT MUNICIPAL LINE WITH MANCHESTER TOWNSHIP, YORK COUNTY, STATION 1038+52 HEADING IN A NORTHERLY DIRECTION TO START OF STATE ROUTE 297, AT STATION 1146+76, A DISTANCE OF 10,824 FEET OR 2.05 MILES.Section 2 3. The following apply:(1) If South Hanover Township, DAUPHIN COUNTY, accepts the turn-back of Canal Road (State Route 2022, formerly Legislative Route 22051) from a beginning point at Sand Beach Road (SR 2015), Segment 0010 Offset 0000 (station 0+00) heading in an easterly direction to municipal line with East Hanover Township, Segment 0010 Offset 2378 (station 23+78) for a distance of 2,378 feet or 0.450 miles, having an existing right-of-way width of 40 feet, the Department of Transportation of the Commonwealth shall transmit notice of the acceptance to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(2) If East Hanover Township, DAUPHIN COUNTY, accepts 20250HB0333PN0432 - 2 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the turn-back of Canal Road (State Route 2022, formerly Legislative Route 22051) from a beginning point at the municipal line with South Hanover Township, Segment 0010 Offset 2378 (station 23+78) heading in an easterly direction to SR 0743 (formerly Legislative Route 22014), Segment 0040 Offset 2665 (station 111+49) for a distance of 8,771 feet or 1.661 miles, having an existing right-of-way width of 40 feet, the Department of Transportation of the Commonwealth shall transmit notice of the acceptance to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 3 4. The Department of Transportation of the Commonwealth shall maintain ownership of the structure on Canal Road over Bow Creek (BMS 22202200300964/ BRKEY 14499).SECTION 5. IF CONEWAGO TOWNSHIP, YORK COUNTY, ACCEPTS THE TURN-BACK OF BOWERS BRIDGE ROAD (STATE ROUTE 1013, FORMERLY LEGISLATIVE ROUTE 66200) FROM A BEGINNING POINT AT CONEWAGO CREEK ROAD (STATE ROUTE 1004), SEGMENT 0010 OFFSET 0000 (STATION 0+00) HEADING IN AN EASTERLY DIRECTION TO INTERSECTION WITH CLY ROAD (STATE ROUTE 1913), SEGMENT 0030 OFFSET 3112 (STATION 91+13) FOR A DISTANCE OF 9,113 FEET OR 1.726 MILES, HAVING AN EXISTING RIGHT-OF-WAY WIDTH OF 40 FEET, AND UPON THE COMPLETION OF PROPOSED IMPROVEMENTS ON STATE ROUTE 921, THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION OF THE COMMONWEALTH SHALL TRANSMIT NOTICE OF THE ACCEPTANCE AND COMPLETION OF PROPOSED IMPROVEMENTS TO THE LEGISLATIVE REFERENCE BUREAU FOR PUBLICATION IN THE NEXT AVAILABLE ISSUE OF THE PENNSYLVANIA BULLETIN.Section 4 6. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) This section shall take effect immediately.(2) Sections 2 and 3 3, 4 AND 5 of this act shall take 20250HB0333PN0432 - 3 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 effect immediately.(3) The amendment of section 23 of the act shall take effect upon publication of the notices in the Pennsylvania Bulletin under section 2 3 of this act.(4) THE AMENDMENT OF SECTION 67 OF THE ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT UPON PUBLICATION OF THE NOTICE IN THE PENNSYLVANIA BULLETIN UNDER SECTION 5 OF THIS ACT.20250HB0333PN0432 - 4 - <--<--1234567